en: natural sage flavouring
de: Natürliches Salbeiaroma
fi: luontainen salvia-aromi
fr: arôme naturel de sauge
hr: prirodna aroma kadulje
hu: természetes zsálya aroma
it: aroma naturale di salvia

en: natural nut flavouring
de: natürliches Nussaroma
es: sabor natural a nuez, sabor natural nuez
fi: luontainen pähkinäaromi
fr: arôme naturel de noix
hr: prirodna aroma oraha
hu: természetes dió aroma
it: aroma naturale di noci

en: natural milk flavouring
de: natürliches Milcharoma
es: aroma natural de leche
fi: luontainen maitoaromi
fr: arôme naturel de lait
hr: prirodna aroma mlijeka
hu: természetes tej aroma
it: aroma naturale di latte
nl: natuurlijk melkaroma

en: natural salmon flavouring
de: natürliches Lachsaroma, natürliches Lachs-Aroms
fi: luontainen lohiaromi
fr: arôme naturel de saumon
hr: prirodna aroma lososa
hu: természetes lazac aroma
it: aroma naturale di salmone

en: natural jasmine flavouring
de: natürliches Jasminaroma
fi: luontainen jasmiiniaromi
fr: arôme naturel de jasmin
hr: prirodna aroma jasmina
hu: természetes jázmin aroma
it: aroma naturale di gelsomino

en: natural fig flavouring
de: natürliches Feigenaroma, natürliches Feigen-Aroma
fi: luontainen viikuna-aromi
fr: arôme naturel de figue
hr: prirodna aroma smokve
hu: természetes füge aroma
it: aroma naturale di fichi

en: cheese flavouring
bg: аромат сирене, аромат на сирене
de: Käsearoma, Käse Aroma
es: aromas con sabor a queso, aroma queso, aroma de queso
fr: Goût fromage
hr: aroma sira
hu: sajt ízesítés
it: aroma di formaggio
nl: kaasaroma
pl: aromat serowy
pt: sabor a queijo
ro: aromă de brânză
sv: ostsmak

en: cheddar flavouring, cheddar flavour, cheddar flavor
de: Cheddar Aroma
fr: arôme de cheddar
sv: cheddararom, cheddar aromer

en: natural cheddar flavouring
de: natürliches Cheddararoma, natürliches Cheddar-Aroma
fi: luontainen cheddar-aromi, luontainen cheddarjuustoaromi
fr: arôme naturel de cheddar
hr: prirodna aroma cheddara
hu: természetes cheddar aroma
it: aroma naturale di cheddar
sv: naturlig cheddarostarom

en: natural cheese flavouring
de: natürliches Käsearoma
es: sabor natural a queso
fr: arôme naturel de fromage
hr: prirodna aroma sira
hu: természetes sajt aroma
it: aroma naturale di formaggio
nl: natuurlijk kaasaroma
pl: naturalny aromat sera

en: bergamot orange flavouring, bergamot flavouring
de: Bergamottenaroma, Bergamotten-Aroma
fi: bergamottiaromi
fr: arôme de bergamote
hr: aroma bergamota
hu: természetes bergamot narancs aroma
it: Aroma di bergamotto

en: natural bergamot orange flavouring
de: natürliches Bergamottenaroma, natürliches Bergamotten-Aroma
fi: luontainen bergamottiaromi
fr: arôme naturel de bergamote
hr: prirodna aroma bergamot naranče
it: aroma naturale di bergamotto

en: truffle flavouring
de: Trüffelaroma, Trüffel-Aroma
es: aroma de trufa
fi: tryffeliaromi
fr: arôme de truffe
hr: aroma bijelog tartufa
hu: trüffel aroma
it: aroma di tartufo
nl: truffelaroma
pl: aromat truflowy
pt: sabor a trufa
ro: aromă de trufe
sv: tryffelarom

en: honey flavouring
it: aroma di miele
pl: aromat miodu

en: natural honey flavouring
de: natürliches Honigaroma, natürliches Honig-Aroma
fi: luontainen hunaja-aromi
fr: arôme naturel de miel
hr: prirodna aroma meda
hu: természetes méz aroma
it: aroma naturale di miele
pl: naturalny aromat miodu, naturalny aromat miodowy

en: natural shallot flavouring
de: natürliches Schalottenaroma, natürliches Schalotten-Aroma
fi: luontainen salottisipuliaromi
fr: arôme naturel d'échalote
hr: prirodna aroma ljutike
hu: természetes mogyoróhagyma aroma
it: aroma naturale di scalogno

en: butter natural flavouring, natural butter flavour
de: natürliches Butteraroma, natürliches Butter-Aroma
es: aroma natural de mantequilla
fi: luontainen voiaromi
fr: arôme naturel de beurre
hr: maslac prirodne arome
hu: természetes vaj aroma
it: Aroma di burro naturale
nl: natuurlijk boteraroma

en: beef flavouring
de: Rindfleischaroma, Rindfleisch-Aroma
es: Sabor res
fi: naudanliha-aromi
fr: arôme de boeuf
hr: aroma govedine
hu: természetes marhahús aroma
it: aroma al manzo
nl: rundvleesaroma
pl: aromat wołowy
pt: sabor a carne de vaca
ro: aromă de carne de vită
sv: biffarom

en: natural chocolate flavouring
de: natürliches Schokoladenaroma, natürliches Schokoladen-Aroma
fi: luontainen suklaa-aromi
fr: arôme naturel de chocolat
hr: prirodna aroma čokolade
hu: természetes csokoládé aroma
it: aroma naturale di cioccolato
pl: naturalny aromat czekoladowy

en: natural rose flavouring
de: natürliches Rosenaroma
fi: luontainen ruusuaromi
fr: arôme naturel de rose
hr: prirodna aroma ruže
hu: természetes rózsa aroma
it: aroma naturale di rosa